California, session 20252026, AB2363.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 61020 of the Revenue and Taxation Code is amended to read:61020. An Individual Shared Responsibility Penalty shall not be imposed on a responsible individual for a month in which any of the following circumstances apply:(a) If the responsible individual’s required contribution, determined on an annual basis, for coverage for the month exceeds 8.3 percent of that responsible individual’s applicable household income for the taxable year.(1) For purposes of applying this subdivision, a responsible individual’s applicable household income shall be increased by any exclusion from gross income for any portion of the required contribution made through a salary reduction arrangement for any applicable household member.(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the term “required contribution” means either of the following:(A) In the case of a responsible individual eligible to purchase minimum essential coverage consisting of coverage through an eligible employer-sponsored plan, the portion of the annual premium that would be paid by the responsible individual, without regard to whether paid through salary reduction or otherwise, for self-only coverage.(B) In the case of a responsible individual eligible only to purchase minimum essential coverage in the individual market, the annual premium for the lowest cost bronze plan available in the individual market through the Exchange in the rating area in which the individual resides, reduced by any premium assistance for the taxable year determined as if the responsible individual was covered by a qualified health plan offered through the Exchange for the entire taxable year.(3) For purposes of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2), if a responsible individual is eligible for minimum essential coverage through an employer by reason of a relationship to an applicable household member, the determination under this subdivision shall be made by reference to the portion of the premium required to be paid by the applicable household member for family coverage.(4) In the case of plan years beginning in any calendar year after 2019, this subdivision shall be applied by substituting for “8.3 percent” an amount equal to 8 percent increased by the amount the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services determines reflects the excess of the rate of premium growth between the preceding calendar year and 2013 over the rate of income growth for that period. If the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services fails to determine this percentage for a calendar year, the Exchange shall determine the percentage.(b) If the responsible individual’s applicable household income for the taxable year containing the month is less than the amount of adjusted gross income specified in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 18501 for that taxable year.(c) If the responsible individual’s gross income for the taxable year containing the month is less than the amount specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 18501.(d) If the applicable household member with respect to whom the penalty would otherwise be imposed was enrolled in Medi-Cal in 2024 or 2025.